Maryland, session 2025, HB0651.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
2–102.
(a) The Commission consists of [five] SEVEN commissioners, appointed by the
Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(b) (1) Each commissioner shall be a registered voter of the State.
(2) OF THE SEVEN COMMISSIONERS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0651*

HOUSE BILL 651
(I) ONE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE A RESIDENT OF WESTERN
MARYLAND, WHICH IS THE REGION THAT CONSISTS OF ALLEGANY COUNTY,
CARROLL COUNTY, FREDERICK COUNTY, GARRETT COUNTY, AND WASHINGTON
COUNTY;
(II) ONE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE A RESIDENT OF SOUTHERN
MARYLAND, WHICH IS THE REGION THAT CONSISTS OF CALVERT COUNTY, CHARLES
COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S COUNTY;
(III) ONE COMMISSIONER SHALL BE A RESIDENT OF THE
EASTERN SHORE, WHICH IS THE REGION THAT CONSISTS OF CAROLINE COUNTY,
CECIL COUNTY, DORCHESTER COUNTY, KENT COUNTY, QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY,
SOMERSET COUNTY, TALBOT COUNTY, WICOMICO COUNTY, AND WORCESTER
COUNTY;
(IV) TWO COMMISSIONERS SHALL BE RESIDENTS OF CENTRAL
MARYLAND, WHICH IS THE REGION THAT CONSISTS OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY,
BALTIMORE COUNTY, HARFORD COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY, AND BALTIMORE
CITY; AND
(V) TWO COMMISSIONERS SHALL BE RESIDENTS OF THE
CAPITAL REGION, WHICH IS THE REGION THAT CONSISTS OF MONTGOMERY
COUNTY AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
[(2)] (3) The Commission shall be:
(i) broadly representative of the geographic and demographic
diversity of the State and of the public; and
(ii) composed of individuals with diverse training and experience.
(c) Each commissioner shall devote full time to the duties of office.
(d) (1) The term of a commissioner is 5 years and begins on July 1.
(2) The terms of commissioners are staggered as required by the terms in
effect for commissioners on July 1, 2006.
(3) At the end of a term, a commissioner continues to serve until a successor
qualifies.
(4) A commissioner who is appointed after a term has begun serves for the
rest of the term and until a successor qualifies.

HOUSE BILL 651 3
(e) Before taking office, each appointee to the Commission shall take the oath
required by Article I, § 9 of the Maryland Constitution.
(f) The Governor may remove a commissioner for incompetence or misconduct in
accordance with § 3–307 of the State Government Article.
2–103.
(a) With the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint a
[Chairman] CHAIR FROM AMONG THE COMMISSIONERS.
(b) (1) The term of the [Chairman] CHAIR is 5 years and begins on July 1.
(2) At the end of a term, the [Chairman] CHAIR continues to serve until a
successor qualifies.
(3) A [Chairman] CHAIR who is appointed after a term has begun serves
for the rest of the term and until a successor qualifies.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before August 1, 2025,
the Public Service Commission shall submit a slate of nominees to the Governor for the
initial appointment of the following two members added to the Public Service Commission
as enacted under Section 1 of this Act:
(1) one member who is a resident of Western Maryland; and
(2) one member who is a resident of Southern Maryland.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to the term of the Chair or any other member of the Public Service Commission
serving before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.